Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 3 CHILD CARE LICENSING
26.5-5-308. Application of part - neighborhood youth organizations - rules - licensing - duties and responsibilities - definitions.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part 3 to the contrary, a neighborhood youth organization that is not otherwise licensed to operate under this part 3 may obtain a neighborhood youth organization license pursuant to this section. A neighborhood youth organization that obtains a license pursuant to this section is subject only to the requirements of this section and is otherwise be exempt from the requirements of this part 3.

The executive director shall promulgate rules to establish a neighborhood youth organization license, including but not limited to the fee required to apply for and obtain the license. The rules shall not concern staff-to-youth ratios.

(2.5) The neighborhood youth organization's programs and services must occur primarily in a facility the neighborhood youth organization leases or owns or has been granted use of or access to.

A neighborhood youth organization licensed pursuant to this section and operating in the state of Colorado has the following duties and responsibilities:

To inform a parent or legal guardian of the requirements of this subsection (3) and to post a notice in bold print and in plain view on the premises of the facility in which the neighborhood youth organization operates that lists the following information:

The requirements of this subsection (3); and

The telephone number and address of the appropriate division within the department for investigating complaints concerning a neighborhood youth organization, with the instruction that any complaint regarding the neighborhood youth organization's compliance with these requirements be directed to that division;

Prior to admitting an interested youth member into the neighborhood youth organization, to require the youth member's parent or legal guardian to sign a statement authorizing the youth member to participate in the programs and services of the neighborhood youth organization;

To establish a process to receive and resolve complaints from parents or legal guardians;

To establish a process to report known or suspected child abuse or neglect to appropriate authorities pursuant to section 19-3-304;

To maintain, either at the neighborhood youth organization or at a central administrative facility, records for each youth member admitted into the neighborhood youth organization containing, at a minimum, the following information:

The youth member's full name;

The youth member's date of birth;

The name, address, and telephone number of a parent or legal guardian of the youth member;

The name and telephone number of at least one emergency contact person for the youth member; and

A parent's or legal guardian's written authorization for the youth member to attend the neighborhood youth organization;

To require a youth member's parent or legal guardian to sign a statement authorizing the neighborhood youth organization to provide transportation prior to field trips or to and from the neighborhood youth organization;

To follow the requirements specified in subsection (4) of this section for a fingerprint-based or other criminal history record check of each employee and volunteer who works with or will work with youth members five or more days in a calendar month;

To offer programs and services that are evidence- or research-based, age-appropriate, and foster supportive relationships with peers and adults while offering character and leadership development, academic supports, job skills training, behavioral health supports, health and nutrition services, and other critical resources and services that a community identifies as necessary; and

To serve all children, youth, and families, but with a focus on programs and services that ensure affordable access for low-income populations.

(3.4) To protect the safety of youth members, a neighborhood youth organization may create an electronic or written process to record the daily arrival and departure times of youth members in order to:

Track attendance;

Assess the impact of programs and services on youth members; and

Ensure the neighborhood youth organization operates in the best interest and safety of youth members.

(3.5) (a) To protect the safety of youth members, each neighborhood youth organization shall maintain a complete set of records for youth members and personnel. Each neighborhood youth organization shall maintain the confidentiality of the following records, and such records are not subject to review by the public:

Information identifying a youth member or a youth member's family;

Scholastic, health, and social or psychological records, which are available only to the youth member to whom the records pertain or the youth member's parent or legal guardian;

Personal references for personnel as requested by the state department; and

Reports and records received from other agencies, including police and child protection investigation reports.

If a central administrative facility retains records in a central file for more than one neighborhood youth organization, duplicate copies of the information described in subsections (3)(e) and (3.5)(a) of this section for youth members and personnel must also be maintained at the neighborhood youth organization location that the youth member attends and to which the staff member is assigned.

Each neighborhood youth organization or central administrative facility shall maintain all required records for at least three years, including confidential records.

Notwithstanding subsection (3.5)(a) of this section to the contrary, each neighborhood youth organization or central administrative facility shall make the records of personnel or youth members available upon request to authorized personnel of the state department pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(j.7).

Neighborhood youth organizations shall cooperate with all state and local investigations regarding incidents, including but not limited to licensing violations, child abuse, and incidents affecting the health, safety, and welfare of youth members.

Records concerning the licensing of neighborhood youth organization facilities and agencies are open to the public. A person who wishes to review a record must submit a written request to the state department.

A licensed neighborhood youth organization shall require all employees and volunteers who work directly with or will work directly with youth members five or more days in a calendar month to obtain, prior to employment, and every two years thereafter, one of the following:

A fingerprint-based criminal history records check utilizing the Colorado bureau of investigation and request the department to ascertain whether the person being investigated has been convicted of felony child abuse as specified in section 18-6-401 or a felony offense involving unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9). The neighborhood youth organization shall not hire a person as an employee or approve a person as a volunteer after confirmation of such a criminal history.

A federal bureau of investigation fingerprint-based criminal history records check utilizing the Colorado bureau of investigation if the employee, volunteer, or applicant has resided in the state of Colorado less than two years. The neighborhood youth organization shall request the department to ascertain whether the person being investigated has been convicted of felony child abuse as specified in section 18-6-401 or a felony offense involving unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9). The neighborhood youth organization shall not hire a person as an employee or approve a person as a volunteer after confirmation of such a criminal history.

A comparison search by the department on the ICON system of the state judicial department or a comparison search on any other database that is recognized on a statewide basis by using the name, date of birth, and social security number information that the department determines is appropriate to determine whether the person being investigated has been convicted of felony child abuse as specified in section 18-6-401 or a felony offense involving unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9). The neighborhood youth organization shall not hire a person as an employee or approve a person as a volunteer after confirmation of such a criminal history.

A separate background check by a private entity regulated as a consumer reporting agency pursuant to 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681 et seq., that must disclose, at a minimum, sexual offenders and felony convictions and include a social security number trace, a national criminal file check, and a state or county criminal file search. The separate background check must ascertain whether the person being investigated has been convicted of felony child abuse as specified in section 18-6-401 or a felony offense involving unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9). The neighborhood youth organization shall not hire a person as an employee or approve a person as a volunteer after confirmation of such a criminal history.

A person who visits or takes part in the activities of a licensed neighborhood youth organization but who is not required to obtain a criminal history record check pursuant to subsection (4) of this section must at all times be under the supervision of an employee or volunteer who has been hired or approved after obtaining a criminal history record check pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

The governing board of each licensed neighborhood youth organization shall adopt minimum standards for operating the licensed neighborhood youth organization, including but not limited to standards regarding operations, health and safety, financial responsibilities, and personnel. The personnel standards must address employee and volunteer screening practices, training practices, insurance coverage, and regular assessment practices for the health and safety of youth, facilities, and child abuse prevention, which may include mandated reporting requirements, audits, and fees.

The department is authorized to receive, respond to, and investigate any complaint concerning compliance with the requirements set forth in this section for a licensed neighborhood youth organization.

A licensed neighborhood youth organization is not required to obtain or keep on file immunization records for youth members participating in the organization's activities.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Employee" means a paid employee of a neighborhood youth organization who is eighteen years of age or older.

"Volunteer" means a person who volunteers assistance to a neighborhood youth organization and who is eighteen years of age or older.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 735, § 3, effective July 1; (3)(b), (3)(f), and (6) amended and (2.5), (3)(h), (3)(i), (3.4), and (3.5) added, (SB 22-064), ch. 22, p. 145, § 2, effective March 17.

26.5-5-309. Licenses - definition - rules.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this part 3, a person shall not operate an agency or facility defined in this part 3 without first being licensed by the department to operate or maintain the agency or facility and paying the prescribed fee. A license issued by the department is permanent unless otherwise revoked or suspended pursuant to section 26.5-5-317.

The department may issue a provisional license once for a period of six months to an applicant for an original license, permitting the applicant to operate a family child care home or child care center if the applicant is temporarily unable to conform to all standards required under this part 3, upon proof by the applicant that the applicant is attempting to conform to the standards or to comply with any other requirements. The applicant has the right to appeal any standard that the applicant believes presents an undue hardship or has been applied too stringently by the department. Upon the filing of an appeal, the department shall proceed in the manner prescribed for licensee appeals in section 26.5-5-314 (5).

The department shall not issue a license for a child care center until the facilities to be operated or maintained by the applicant or licensee are approved by the department of public health and environment as conforming to the sanitary standards prescribed by said department pursuant to section 25-1.5-101 (1)(h) and unless the facilities conform to fire prevention and protection requirements of local fire departments in the locality of the facility or, in lieu thereof, of the division of labor standards and statistics in the department of labor and employment.

A child care center that provides child care exclusively to school-age children and operates on the property of a school district, district charter school, or institute charter school may satisfy any fire or radon inspection requirement required by law by providing a copy of a satisfactory fire or radon inspection report of the property of a school district, district charter school, or institute charter school where the child care is provided if the fire or radon inspection report was completed within the preceding twelve months. The department shall not require a duplicate fire or radon inspection if a satisfactory fire or radon inspection report of the property was completed within the preceding twelve months.

The department shall not issue a license to operate a family child care home or a child care center if the applicant for the license, an affiliate of the applicant, a person employed by the applicant, or a person who resides with the applicant at the facility has been convicted of:
(4) (a) (I) The department shall not issue a license to operate a family child care home or a child care center if the applicant for the license, an affiliate of the applicant, a person employed by the applicant, or a person who resides with the applicant at the facility has been convicted of:

Child abuse, as specified in section 18-6-401;

A crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406;

Any offenses involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9);

Any felony, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3;

Any felony involving physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense within the five years preceding the date of application for a license;

A pattern of misdemeanor convictions, as defined by department rule, within the ten years immediately preceding the date of submission of the application;

Any offense in any other state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any one of the offenses described in subsections (4)(a)(I)(A) to (4)(a)(I)(F) of this section.

As used in this subsection (4)(a), "convicted" means a conviction by a jury or by a court and also includes a deferred judgment and sentence agreement, a deferred prosecution agreement, a deferred adjudication agreement, an adjudication, and a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.

The department shall determine the convictions identified in subsection (4)(a) of this section according to the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation, the ICON system at the state judicial department, or any other source, as set forth in section 26.5-5-316 (1)(a)(II). A certified copy of the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction of such conviction, deferred judgment and sentence agreement, deferred prosecution agreement, or deferred adjudication agreement is prima facie evidence of the conviction or agreement. The department shall not issue a license to operate a family child care home or a child care center if the department has a certified court order from another state indicating that the person applying for the license has been convicted of child abuse or any unlawful sexual offense against a child under a law of any other state or the United States, or the department has a certified court order from another state that the person applying for the license has entered into a deferred judgment or deferred prosecution agreement in another state as to child abuse or any sexual offense against a child.

The department shall not issue a license to operate an agency or facility defined in this part 3 if the person applying for the license or an affiliate of the applicant, a person employed by the applicant, or a person who resides with the applicant at the facility, has been determined to be insane or mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and a court has entered, pursuant to part 3 or part 4 of article 14 of title 15 or section 27-65-109 (4) or 27-65-127, an order specifically finding that the mental incompetency or insanity is of such a degree that the applicant is incapable of operating a family child care home or child care center. The record of the determination and entry of the order are conclusive evidence of the determination.

The department and the department of education shall streamline all paperwork that licensed early care and education programs and early childhood educators must complete to meet child care licensing and early childhood educator credentialing compliance requirements. The state agencies shall identify ways to share information and reports across the agencies to reduce the administrative and paperwork burden on early care and education programs and educators. The streamlining process must include a systems scan of programs and initiatives, identification of overlapping reporting requirements, and ways to reduce the administrative and paperwork burden on programs and educators.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 737, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-104 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-310. Compliance with local government zoning regulations - notice to local governments - provisional licensure - rules.

The department shall require any child care facility seeking licensure pursuant to section 26.5-5-309 to comply with any applicable zoning and land use development regulations of the municipality, city and county, or county where the facility is situated. Failure to comply with applicable zoning and land use regulations constitutes grounds for the denial of a license to a facility.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) of this section to the contrary, the availability of safe, affordable, and licensed family child care homes is a matter of statewide concern. Therefore, permitting fragmented regulation among jurisdictions impedes and infringes upon the department's appropriate and consistent licensing and regulation of family child care homes throughout the state. Accordingly, local governing authorities shall treat family child care homes as residential property use in the application of local regulations, including zoning, land use development, fire and life safety, sanitation, and building codes. Local governing authorities shall not impose any additional regulations governing family child care homes that do not also apply to other residential properties, provided that the foregoing does not restrict an authority's ability to prohibit, on a case-by-case basis, the operation in immediately adjacent residences of two or more large family child care homes, as that term is defined by department rules that govern the operation of family child care homes, or to manage the flow of traffic and parking related to adjacent large family child care homes. Residential use of property for zoning purposes includes all forms of residential zoning and, specifically, although not exclusively, single-family residential zoning.

The department shall assure that timely written notice is provided to the municipality, city and county, or county where a child care facility is situated, including the address of the facility and the population and number of persons to be served by the facility, when any of the following occurs:

A person applies for a license to operate a child care facility pursuant to section 26.5-5-309; or

A license is granted to operate a child care facility pursuant to section 26.5-5-309.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the event of a zoning or other delay or dispute between a child care facility and the municipality, city and county, or county where the facility is situated, the department may grant a provisional license to the facility for up to six months pending resolution of the delay or dispute.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 743, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to several former provisions of § 26-6-104.5 as they existed prior to 2022. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

26.5-5-311. Fees - when original applications, reapplications, and renewals for licensure are required - creation of child care licensing cash fund - rules.

The department is authorized to establish, pursuant to rules promulgated by the executive director, permanent, time-limited, and provisional license fees and fees for continuation of a license for the following types of child care arrangements:

Family child care homes, including any special type of family child care home designated by department rules pursuant to section 26.5-5-314 (2)(n), but excluding homes certified by county departments or child placement agencies;

Child care centers;

Children's resident camps; and

Substitute placement agencies.

The department may also establish fees pursuant to rules promulgated by the executive director for the following situations:

Issuance of a duplicate license;

Change of license due to an increase in licensing capacity or a change in the age of children served;

Obtaining the criminal record of an applicant and any person living with or employed by the applicant, which may include costs associated with the taking of fingerprints;

Checking the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department of human services for an owner, employee, or resident of a facility or agency or an applicant for a license to operate a facility or agency;

Filing of appeals;

Duplication of licensing records for the public;

Duplication of licensing records in electronic format for the public; and

Insufficient funds payment and collection of overdue fees and fines.

The fees established pursuant to this subsection (1) must not exceed the direct and indirect costs incurred by the department. The department shall develop and implement an objective and systematic approach for setting, monitoring, and revising child care licensing fees by developing and using an ongoing method to track all direct and indirect costs associated with child care inspection licensing, developing a methodology to assess the relationship between licensing costs and fees, and annually reassessing costs and fees and reporting the results to the executive director. In developing a fee schedule, the department should consider the licensed capacity of facilities and the time needed to license facilities.

The fees specified in subsection (1) of this section must be paid when application is made for any license is sought and are not subject to refund. Applications for licenses are required in the situations that are set forth in subsection (2)(b) of this section and must be made on forms prescribed by the department. Each completed application must set forth such information as required by the department. All licenses continue in force until revoked, surrendered, or expired.

An original application and fee are required:

When an individual, partnership, corporation, or association plans to open a child care center or children's resident camp;

When the child care center or children's resident camp plans to move the center or facility to a different building at a different location;

When the management or governing body of a child care center or children's resident camp is acquired by a different individual, association, partnership, or corporation;

When a change occurs in the operating entity of a child care center or children's resident camp resulting in a new federal employee identification number; except that, if the reason for the issuance of a new federal employee identification number is solely due to a change in the corporate structure of the operating entity and either the management or governing body of the entity remains the same as originally licensed and the entity is operating in the same facility or facilities as originally licensed, the department shall treat the entity's status as a renewal and assess the applicable renewal fee. Only newly hired employees are required to undergo criminal background checks as required in section 26.5-5-316.

When a family or person plans to open a family child care home, including any special type of family child care home designated by department rules pursuant to section 26.5-5-314 (2)(n);

When a family or person who operates a family child care home, including any special type of family child care home designated by department rules pursuant to section 26.5-5-314 (2)(n), moves to a new residence.

The department may require and receive a reapplication and fee in the manner specified in department rules.

This section does not prevent a city or city and county from imposing fees in addition to those fees specified under this section.

The department shall transmit all fees collected pursuant to this section to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the child care licensing cash fund, which is hereby created. The general assembly shall make annual appropriations from the child care licensing cash fund for expenditures incurred by the department in the performance of its duties under this part 3. The treasurer shall credit to the fund all interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund remains in the fund and is not credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 744, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-105 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-312. Application forms - criminal sanctions for perjury.

All applications for the licensure of a child care facility pursuant to this part 3 must include the notice to the applicant that is set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(1) (a) (I) All applications for the licensure of a child care facility pursuant to this part 3 must include the notice to the applicant that is set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Every application used in the state of Colorado for employment with a child care provider or facility must include the notice to the applicant that is set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Each application described in subsection (1)(a) of this section must contain the following notice to the applicant:

Any person applying for the licensure of a child care facility pursuant to this part 3 or any person applying to work at such a facility as an employee who knowingly or willfully makes a false statement of any material fact or thing in the application commits perjury in the second degree as defined in section 18-8-503, and, upon conviction thereof, must be punished accordingly.

Any applicant who knowingly or willfully makes a false statement of any material fact or thing in this application commits perjury in the second degree as defined in section 18-8-503, Colorado Revised Statutes, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished accordingly.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 747, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-105.5 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-313. Applications - materials waivers - appeals - rules.

A child care center that is subject to the licensing requirements of this part 3 is also subject to the provisions of this section.

The department shall make available to licensed child care centers and include with every application form for licensure information concerning the manner in which a child care center may apply for a waiver to use certain materials in its program and curriculum. The waiver request must be included in a center's application for licensure or, in the case of a licensed child care center, may be submitted at any time.

A child care center seeking a waiver for the use of certain materials must adopt a policy that:

Ensures that instructors in the child care center are trained in the use of the materials in a way that provides reasonable safety provisions for use by children; and

Requires parental notification of the use of the materials in the child care center and the potential safety risks associated with the materials. The policy must require the child care center to obtain signed parental consent forms acknowledging awareness of the risks in using the materials in the child care center.

If a licensed child care center receives notice of a violation pursuant to this part 3, information concerning the waiver and appeal process described in this section must be included in the notification to the child care center.

The executive director shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this section, including:

The requirements for the granting of a waiver request, including the requirement that the department make a decision on the waiver request and notify the child care center of its decision no later than sixty calendar days after receipt of the request;

The requirements for the denial of a waiver request, including the requirement that the department make a decision on the waiver request and notify the child care center of its decision no later than sixty calendar days after receipt of the request; and

The process by which a child care center may appeal a denial of a waiver request, which process must, at a minimum, provide that:

Upon the receipt of a denial of a waiver request, a child care center has up to forty-five calendar days to appeal the denial decision to the department;

The department shall act upon the appeal within forty-five calendar days;

The department shall provide notice of its decision on the appeal within ten calendar days after its decision to the appealing child care center; and

The appealing child care center has the right to meet in person with department personnel concerning the appeal.

Whenever practicable, the department shall use the same inspector for:

Multiple visits to a single child care center seeking a waiver pursuant to this section; or

Multiple visits to two or more individually licensed child care centers that are wholly owned, operated, and controlled by a common ownership group.

The department shall not post a denial of a waiver made pursuant to this section on its website until the appeal is final.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 747, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-105.7 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-314. Standards for facilities and agencies - rules - definition.

The department shall prescribe and publish standards for licensing. The standards must be applicable to the various types of facilities and agencies for child care regulated and licensed by this part 3. The department shall seek the advice and assistance of persons representative of the various types of child care facilities and agencies in establishing the standards, including the advice and assistance of the department of public safety and councils and associations representing fire marshals and building code officials in the promulgation of any rules related to adequate fire protection and prevention, as allowed in subsection (2)(e) of this section, in a family child care home. The standards must be established by rules promulgated by the executive director and be issued, published, and become effective only in conformity with article 4 of title 24.

The standards prescribed by department rules are restricted to:

The operation and conduct of the facility or agency and the responsibility it assumes for child care;

The character, suitability, and qualifications of the applicant for a license and of other persons directly responsible for the care and welfare of children served, including whether an affiliate of the licensee has ever been the subject of a negative licensing action;

The general financial ability and competence of the applicant for a license to provide necessary care for children and to maintain prescribed standards;

The number of individuals or staff required to ensure adequate supervision and care of children served;

The appropriateness, safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises, including maintenance of adequate fire protection and prevention and health standards in conformance with state laws and municipal ordinances, to provide for the physical comfort, care, well-being, and safety of the children served.

A child care center that provides child care exclusively to school-age children and operates on the property of a school district, district charter school, or institute charter school may satisfy any fire or radon inspection requirement required by law by providing a copy of a satisfactory fire or radon inspection report of the property of a school district, district charter school, or institute charter school where the child care is provided if the fire or radon inspection report was completed within the preceding twelve months. The department shall not require a duplicate fire or radon inspection if a satisfactory fire or radon inspection report of the property was completed within the preceding twelve months.

The department shall require an annual inspection of playground facilities on the property where a child care center operates. For purposes of a playground facility inspection, the department shall accept as satisfactory proof of valid certification of the playground facility, certification, or a copy of certification, from an individual who is licensed or certified to perform playground safety inspections through the national recreation and park association, or other nationally recognized playground facility safety organization. The department shall not require a duplicate inspection if a satisfactory inspection report was completed within the preceding twelve months.

Keeping of records for food, clothing, equipment, and individual supplies;

Provisions to safeguard the legal rights of children served;

Maintenance of records pertaining to the admission, progress, health, and discharge of children;

Filing of reports with the department;

Discipline of children;

Standards for the appropriateness, safety, and adequacy of transportation services of children to and from child care centers;

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(m) of this section, provisions that ensure that family child care homes and child care centers verify, in accordance with part 9 of article 4 of title 25, that each child has received appropriate immunizations against contagious diseases as follows:

Children up to twenty-four months of age are required to be immunized in accordance with the "Infant Immunization Act", part 17 of article 4 of title 25;

Children over twenty-four months of age are required to be immunized in accordance with part 9 of article 4 of title 25;

Provisions that allow any child care center that allows any child to enroll and attend the center on a short-term basis of up to fifteen days in a fifteen-consecutive-day period, no more than twice in a calendar year, with each fifteen-consecutive-day period separated by at least sixty days, to do so without obtaining verification of immunization for that child, as provided for in section 25-4-902. Any child care center that chooses to allow children to enroll and attend on a short-term basis pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (2)(m) shall provide notification to all parents that the child care center allows children to enroll and attend on a short-term basis without obtaining proof of immunization; and

Rules governing different types of family child care homes as well as any other types of family child care homes that may by necessity be established by rule of the executive director.

As used in this subsection (3), "program" means child care offered by a child care center that holds a license pursuant to this part 3, provides child care exclusively to school-age children, and operates on the property of a school district, district charter school, or institute charter school, referred to in this subsection (3) as "school property".

When an agency or entity performs an inspection required by law for a program, the agency or entity shall provide a copy of the inspection report to the appropriate official of the school district, district charter school, or institute charter school where the child care center operates.

If all of the requirements in section 22-1-119.5 and any additional department rules are met, a school-age child enrolled in a program on school property may possess and self-administer medication for asthma, a food allergy, or anaphylaxis. The executive director may adopt additional rules for programs on school property concerning the authority to possess and self-administer medication for asthma, a food allergy, or anaphylaxis.

If all of the requirements in section 22-1-119.5 and any additional department rules are met, a child enrolled in a large child care center, as defined by rule promulgated by the executive director, may possess and self-administer medication for asthma, a food allergy, or anaphylaxis. The executive director may adopt additional rules concerning the authority to possess and self-administer medication for asthma, a food allergy, or anaphylaxis.

Any applicant or person licensed to operate a child care facility or agency under the provisions of this part 3 has the right to appeal any standard that, in the applicant's or person's opinion, works an undue hardship or when, in the applicant's or person's opinion, a standard has been too stringently applied by representatives of the department. The department shall designate a panel of persons representing various state and local governmental agencies with an interest in and concern for children to hear such appeal and to make recommendations to the department. The membership of the appeals review panel must include, but need not be limited to, a representative from child care providers, a representative from a local early childhood council or local child care resource and referral agency, a state-level early childhood representative with early care and education expertise, and a parent representative. The executive director or the executive director's designee shall appoint all members to the appeals review panel. Members of the appeals review panel serve terms of no more than three years. Representatives to the appeals review panel may serve successive terms.

The executive director shall promulgate rules concerning standards for licensing early care and education programs that facilitate the recruitment and retention of Colorado's early childhood educator workforce as described in section 26.5-6-103.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 749, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-106 as it existed prior to 2022.